Nevada, session 83, SB382.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 482 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A trailer used primarily for farm purposes may be
registered for a 5-year period as provided in this section.
2. A person who registers a trailer for a 5-year period must
pay upon registration all fees and taxes that would be due during
the 5-year period if he or she registered the trailer for 1 year and
renewed that registration for 4 consecutive years immediately
thereafter, including, without limitation:
(a) Registration fees pursuant to NRS 482.480 and 482.483.
(b) A fee for each license plate issued pursuant to
NRS 482.268.
(c) Fees for the initial issuance and renewal of a special
license plate pursuant to NRS 482.265, if applicable.
(d) Fees for the initial issuance and renewal of a personalized
prestige license plate pursuant to NRS 482.367, if applicable.
(e) Additional fees for the initial issuance and renewal of a
special license plate issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to 482.3823,
inclusive, which are imposed to generate financial support for a
particular cause or charitable organization, if applicable.
(f) Governmental services taxes imposed pursuant to chapter
371 of NRS, as provided in NRS 482.260.
(g) The applicable taxes imposed pursuant to chapters 372,
374, 377 and 377A of NRS.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Farm purposes” means the transportation of livestock,
agricultural products or ranch or farm machinery or supplies to or
from a ranch or farm except when in the operation of a common
motor carrier or contract motor carrier.
-
*SB382_R2*

– 3 –
(b) “Trailer” does not include a full trailer or semitrailer that
is registered pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.483.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 482.206 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.206 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 482.2065 and 482.2085, and section 1 of this act, every motor
vehicle, except for a motor vehicle that is required to be registered
through the Motor Carrier Division of the Department, and except
for a full trailer or semitrailer that is registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 or a moped registered pursuant to
NRS 482.2155, must be registered for a period of 12 consecutive
months beginning the day after the first registration by the owner in
this State.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 7 , [and] 8 and
9 and NRS 482.2065, and section 1 of this act, every vehicle
registered by an agent of the Department or a registered dealer must
be registered for 12 consecutive months beginning the first day of
the month after the first registration by the owner in this State.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [7] 8 and NRS
482.2065 and 482.2085, and section 1 of this act, a motor vehicle
which must be registered through the Motor Carrier Division of the
Department, including, without limitation:
(a) Pursuant to the provisions of NRS 706.801 to 706.861,
inclusive; or
(b) As a commercial motor vehicle which has a declared gross
weight in excess of 10,000 pounds,
 must be registered for a period of 12 consecutive months
beginning on the date established by the Department by regulation.
4. Upon the application of the owner of a fleet of vehicles
which are not required to be registered through the Motor Carrier
Division of the Department, the Director may permit the owner to
register the fleet on the basis of a calendar year.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3, 6, 7 , [and] 8
[,] and 9, when the registration of any vehicle is transferred pursuant
to NRS 482.399, the expiration date of each regular license plate,
special license plate or substitute decal must, at the time of the
transfer of registration, be advanced for a period of 12 consecutive
months beginning:
(a) The first day of the month after the transfer, if the vehicle is
transferred by an agent of the Department; or
(b) The day after the transfer in all other cases,
 and a credit on the portion of the fee for registration and the
governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of
the current period of registration must be allowed pursuant to the
applicable provisions of NRS 482.399.
-
*SB382_R2*

– 4 –
6. When the registration of any trailer that is registered for a 3-
year period pursuant to NRS 482.2065 is transferred pursuant to
NRS 482.399, the expiration date of each license plate or substitute
decal must, at the time of the transfer of the registration, be
advanced, if applicable pursuant to NRS 482.2065, for a period of 3
consecutive years beginning:
(a) The first day of the month after the transfer, if the trailer is
transferred by an agent of the Department; or
(b) The day after the transfer in all other cases,
 and a credit on the portion of the fee for registration and
the governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of the
current period of registration must be allowed pursuant to the
applicable provisions of NRS 482.399.
7. When the registration of any trailer that is registered for a
5-year period pursuant to section 1 of this act is transferred
pursuant to NRS 482.399, the expiration date of each license plate
or substitute decal must, at the time of the transfer of the
registration, be advanced, if applicable pursuant to section 1 of
this act, for a period of 5 consecutive years beginning:
(a) The first day of the month after the transfer, if the trailer is
transferred by an agent of the Department; or
(b) The day after the transfer in all other cases,
 and a credit on the portion of the fee for registration and the
governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of
the current period of registration must be allowed pursuant to the
applicable provisions of NRS 482.399.
8. A full trailer or semitrailer that is registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 is registered until the date on which
the owner of the full trailer or semitrailer:
(a) Transfers the ownership of the full trailer or semitrailer; or
(b) Cancels the registration of the full trailer or semitrailer and
surrenders the license plates to the Department.
[8.] 9. A moped that is registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155 is
registered until the date on which the owner of the moped:
(a) Transfers the ownership of the moped; or
(b) Cancels the registration of the moped and surrenders the
license plate to the Department.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. NRS 482.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.260 1. When registering a vehicle, the Department and
its agents or a registered dealer shall:
(a) Collect the fees for license plates and registration as
provided for in this chapter.
(b) Collect the governmental services tax on the vehicle, as
agent for the State and for the county where the applicant intends to
-
*SB382_R2*

– 5 –
base the vehicle for the period of registration, unless the vehicle is
deemed to have no base.
(c) Collect the applicable taxes imposed pursuant to chapters
372, 374, 377 and 377A of NRS.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2085, issue a
certificate of registration.
(e) If the registration is performed by the Department, issue the
regular license plate or plates.
(f) If the registration is performed by a registered dealer, provide
information to the owner regarding the manner in which the regular
license plate or plates will be made available to the owner.
2. Upon proof of ownership satisfactory to the Director or as
otherwise provided in NRS 482.2605, the Director shall cause to be
issued a certificate of title as provided in this chapter.
3. For the purposes of subsection 2, if a manufacturer described
in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 482.36349 operates one or
more of its fully autonomous vehicles for the purpose of providing
delivery services, the Director shall accept as proof of ownership the
manufacturer’s certificate of origin or the manufacturer’s statement
of origin issued for the fully autonomous vehicle. As used in this
paragraph, “fully autonomous vehicle” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 482A.036.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 371.070 and
subsections [7, 8 and 9,] 7 to 10, inclusive, every vehicle being
registered for the first time in Nevada must be taxed for the
purposes of the governmental services tax for a 12-month period.
5. The Department shall deduct and withhold 2 percent of the
taxes collected pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 and remit
the remainder to the Department of Taxation.
6. A registered dealer shall forward all fees and taxes collected
for the registration of vehicles to the Department.
7. A trailer being registered pursuant to NRS 482.2065 must be
taxed for the purposes of the governmental services tax for a 3-year
period.
8. A trailer being registered pursuant to section 1 of this act
must be taxed for the purposes of the governmental services tax
for a 5-year period.
9. A full trailer or semitrailer being registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 must be taxed for the purposes of the
governmental services tax in the amount of $86. The governmental
services tax paid pursuant to this subsection is nontransferable and
nonrefundable.
[9.] 10. A moped being registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155
must be taxed for the purposes of the governmental services tax for
only the 12-month period following the registration. The
-
*SB382_R2*

– 6 –
governmental services tax paid pursuant to this subsection is
nontransferable and nonrefundable.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.5. NRS 482.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.285 1. If any certificate of registration or certificate of
title is lost, mutilated or illegible, the person to whom it was issued
shall immediately make application for and obtain a duplicate or
substitute therefor upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
Department and upon payment of the required fees. An applicant
who is unable to furnish information satisfactory to the Department
that the applicant is entitled to a duplicate or substitute certificate of
title pursuant to this subsection may obtain a new certificate of title
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 482.2605.
2. If any license plate or plates or any decal is lost, mutilated or
illegible, the person to whom it was issued shall immediately make
application for and obtain:
(a) A duplicate number plate or a substitute number plate;
(b) A substitute decal; or
(c) A combination of both (a) and (b),
 as appropriate, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
Department and payment of the fees required by NRS 482.500.
3. If any license plate or plates or any decal is stolen, the
person to whom it was issued shall immediately make application
for and obtain:
(a) A substitute number plate;
(b) A substitute decal; or
(c) A combination of both (a) and (b),
 as appropriate, upon furnishing information satisfactory to the
Department and payment of the fees required by NRS 482.500.
4. The Department shall issue duplicate number plates or
substitute number plates and, if applicable, a substitute decal, if the
applicant:
(a) Returns the mutilated or illegible plates to the Department or
signs a declaration that the plates were lost, mutilated or illegible;
and
(b) Complies with the provisions of subsection 6.
5. The Department shall issue substitute number plates and, if
applicable, a substitute decal, if the applicant:
(a) Signs a declaration that the plates were stolen; and
(b) Complies with the provisions of subsection 6.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an applicant
who desires duplicate number plates or substitute number plates
must make application for renewal of registration. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection [8 or] 9 or 10 of NRS 482.260,
credit must be allowed for the portion of the registration fee and
-
*SB382_R2*

– 7 –
governmental services tax attributable to the remainder of the
current registration period. In lieu of making application for renewal
of registration, an applicant may elect to make application solely
for:
(a) Duplicate number plates or substitute number plates, and a
substitute decal, if the previous license plates were lost, mutilated or
illegible; or
(b) Substitute number plates and a substitute decal, if the
previous license plates were stolen.
7. An applicant who makes the election described in subsection
6 retains the current date of expiration for the registration of the
applicable vehicle and is not, as a prerequisite to receiving duplicate
number plates or substitute number plates or a substitute decal,
required to:
(a) Submit evidence of compliance with controls over emission;
or
(b) Pay the registration fee and governmental services tax
attributable to a full period of registration.
Sec. 5. NRS 482.3667 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.3667 1. The Department shall establish, design and
otherwise prepare for issue personalized prestige license plates and
shall establish all necessary procedures not inconsistent with this
section for the application and issuance of such license plates.
2. The Department shall issue personalized prestige license
plates, upon payment of the prescribed fee, to any person who
otherwise complies with the laws relating to the registration and
licensing of motor vehicles or trailers for use on private passenger
cars, motorcycles, trucks or trailers, except that such plates may not
be issued for a full trailer or semitrailer that is registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 or a moped registered pursuant to
NRS 482.2155.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2065, and section
1 of this act, personalized prestige license plates are valid for 12
months and are renewable upon expiration.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, personalized
prestige license plates may be transferred from one vehicle or trailer
to another if the transfer and registration fees are paid as set out in
this chapter.
5. In case of any conflict, the person who first made
application for personalized prestige license plates and has
continuously renewed them by payment of the required fee has
priority.
6. The Department may limit by regulation the number of
letters and numbers used, prohibit the use of inappropriate letters or
combinations of letters and numbers and prohibit the transfer of
-
*SB382_R2*

– 8 –
personalized prestige license plates from one vehicle or trailer to
another if such a transfer would result in an inappropriate use of
letters or combination of letters and numbers.
7. The Department shall not assign to any person not holding
the relevant office any letters and numbers denoting that the holder
holds a public office.
Sec. 5.5. NRS 482.399 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.399 1. Upon the transfer of the ownership of or interest
in any vehicle by any holder of a valid registration, or upon
destruction of the vehicle, the registration expires.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, the holder of the original registration
may transfer the registration to another vehicle to be registered by
the holder and use the same regular license plate or plates or special
license plate or plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to
482.3823, inclusive, or 482.384, on the vehicle from which the
registration is being transferred, if the license plate or plates are
appropriate for the second vehicle, upon filing an application for
transfer of registration and upon paying the transfer registration fee
and the excess, if any, of the registration fee and governmental
services tax on the vehicle to which the registration is transferred
over the total registration fee and governmental services tax paid on
all vehicles from which he or she is transferring ownership or
interest. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.294, an
application for transfer of registration must be made in person, if
practicable, to any office or agent of the Department or to a
registered dealer, and the license plate or plates may not be used
upon a second vehicle until registration of that vehicle is complete.
3. In computing the governmental services tax, the
Department, its agent or the registered dealer shall credit the portion
of the tax paid on the first vehicle attributable to the remainder of
the current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the second vehicle or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner. If any person
transfers ownership or interest in two or more vehicles, the
Department or the registered dealer shall credit the portion of the tax
paid on all of the vehicles attributable to the remainder of the
current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the vehicle to which the registration is
transferred or on any other vehicle of which the person is the
registered owner. The certificates of registration and unused license
plates of the vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest must be submitted before credit is given against the tax due
on the vehicle to which the registration is transferred or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner.
-
*SB382_R2*

– 9 –
4. In computing the registration fee, the Department or its
agent or the registered dealer shall credit the portion of the
registration fee paid on each vehicle attributable to the remainder of
the current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis
against the registration fee due on the vehicle to which registration
is transferred.
5. If the amount owed on the registration fee or governmental
services tax on the vehicle to which registration is transferred is less
than the credit on the total registration fee or governmental services
tax paid on all vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest, the person may apply the unused portion of the credit to the
registration of any other vehicle owned by the person. Any unused
portion of such a credit expires on the date the registration of the
vehicle from which the person transferred the registration was due
to expire.
6. If the license plate or plates are not appropriate for the
second vehicle, the plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department or registered dealer and an appropriate plate or plates
must be issued by the Department. The Department shall not reissue
the surrendered plate or plates until the next succeeding licensing
period.
7. If application for transfer of registration is not made within
60 days after the destruction or transfer of ownership of or interest
in any vehicle, the license plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department on or before the 60th day for cancellation of the
registration.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
371.040, NRS 482.2155, subsections [8 and] 9 and 10 of NRS
482.260 and subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, if a person cancels his or
her registration and surrenders to the Department the license plates
for a vehicle, the Department shall:
(a) In accordance with the provisions of subsection 9, issue to
the person a refund of the portion of the registration fee and
governmental services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the
remainder of the current calendar year or registration period on a pro
rata basis; or
(b) If the person does not qualify for a refund in accordance with
the provisions of subsection 9, issue to the person a credit in the
amount of the portion of the registration fee and governmental
services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the remainder of the
current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis. Such
a credit may be applied by the person to the registration of any other
vehicle owned by the person. Any unused portion of the credit
expires on the date the registration of the vehicle from which the
person obtained a refund was due to expire.
-
*SB382_R2*

– 10 –
9. The Department shall issue a refund pursuant to subsection 8
only if the request for a refund is made at the time the registration is
cancelled and the license plates are surrendered, the person
requesting the refund is a resident of Nevada, the amount eligible
for refund exceeds $100, and evidence satisfactory to the
Department is submitted that reasonably proves the existence of
extenuating circumstances. For the purposes of this subsection, the
term “extenuating circumstances” means circumstances wherein:
(a) The person has recently relinquished his or her driver’s
license and has sold or otherwise disposed of his or her vehicle.
(b) The vehicle has been determined to be inoperable and the
person does not transfer the registration to a different vehicle.
(c) The owner of the vehicle is seriously ill or has died and the
guardians or survivors have sold or otherwise disposed of the
vehicle.
(d) Any other event occurs which the Department, by regulation,
has defined to constitute an “extenuating circumstance” for the
purposes of this subsection.
Sec. 5.7. NRS 482A.080 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
482A.080 1. An autonomous vehicle shall not be registered
in this State unless the autonomous vehicle has affixed to it a label
pursuant to 49 C.F.R. § 567.4.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection [3,] 4, an
autonomous vehicle shall not be tested or operated on a highway
within this State with a human operator unless the autonomous
vehicle is capable of operating in compliance with the applicable
motor vehicle laws and traffic laws of this State, unless an
exemption has been granted by the Department, and:
(a) If the autonomous vehicle is not a fully autonomous vehicle,
the autonomous vehicle is:
(1) Equipped with a means to engage and disengage the
automated driving system which is easily accessible to the human
operator of the autonomous vehicle;
(2) Equipped with an indicator located inside the
autonomous vehicle which indicates when the automated driving
system is operating the autonomous vehicle; and
(3) Equipped with a means to alert the human operator to
take manual control of the autonomous vehicle if a failure of the
automated driving system occurs which renders the automated
driving system unable to perform the dynamic driving task relevant
to its intended operational design domain; and
(b) If the autonomous vehicle is a fully autonomous vehicle, the
fully autonomous vehicle is capable of achieving a minimal risk
condition if a failure of the automated driving system occurs which
-
*SB382_R2*

– 11 –
renders the automated driving system unable to perform the
dynamic driving task relevant to its intended operational design
domain.
3. An autonomous vehicle that is tested or operated on a
highway within this State may be equipped with one or more
automated driving system marker lamps which are equipped to the
autonomous vehicle in accordance with the standards published in
SAE J3134 and SAE J578.
4. If a federal law or regulation provides standards for the
operation of an autonomous vehicle, an autonomous vehicle may be
tested or used on a highway within this State with a human operator
if the autonomous vehicle is capable of operating in compliance
with the applicable motor vehicle laws and traffic laws of this State
and such a federal law or regulation.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Automated driving system marker lamp” means a device
that emits light to indicate that an automated driving system is
operating the autonomous vehicle.
(b) “SAE J3134” means the document published by SAE
International on May 31, 2019, as “Automated Driving System
(ADS) Marker Lamp” or a document determined by the
Department to be a subsequent version which is approved by the
Department by regulation.
(c) “SAE J578” means the document published by SAE
International on April 29, 2020, as “Chromaticity Requirements
for Ground Vehicle Lamps and Lighting Equipment” or a
document determined by the Department to be a subsequent
version which is approved by the Department by regulation.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
H
-
*SB382_R2*